Tennessee, session 114, SB2262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 47, Chapter 18, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Blacklist" means to:
(A) Reduce visibility or accessibility of a small business's website
on an online platform or other platform;
(B) Remove a small business's website or the search result for
the small business's website from a business entity's platform or the
business entity's related applications or websites; or
(C) Delete or otherwise remove twenty-five percent (25%) or
more of the reviews, if applicable, that a small business has at the time of
removal;
(2) "Online search engine" means an application or website through
which a user can search for information, including the website or contact
information of a small business, on the internet; and
(3) "Small business" means a business entity, including the entity's
affiliates, that employs fifty (50) or fewer full-time employees.
(b) If a business entity blacklists a small business, including an online search
engine on the online search engine company's related applications or websites, then the
SB2262
012004
- 1 -

business entity must provide notice of the action to the small business within twenty-four
(24) hours of the action. The notice must include the following information:
(1) An explanation of why the business entity blacklisted the small
business;
(2) Information for how the small business can remedy or otherwise
respond to the action; and
(3) Contact information for a representative of the online search engine
that the small business may contact to discuss a resolution of the action.
(c)
(1) If a business entity fails to comply with the requirements of subsection
(b), then an affected small business may bring a cause of action in a court of
competent jurisdiction. A court that finds that the business entity violated
subsection (b) may award:
(A) Actual damages;
(B) Punitive damages; or
(C) Reasonable court costs and attorney fees.
(2) In addition to the remedies described under subdivision (c)(1), if a
court finds that a business entity is violating subsection (b), then the court may
order injunctive relief to enjoin the business entity from continuing to violate
subsection (b). A search engine is not in compliance with the requirements of
subsection (b) until all information required under subdivisions (b)(1)-(3) is
provided to the small business.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 012004